Maryland, session 2026, HB1152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Department” means the Department of State Police.
(3) “Special police officer” has the meaning stated in § 3–301 of the Public
Safety Article.
(b) The Department shall study and make recommendations on the employment
and use of special police officers, including:
(1) the commissioning process;
(2) employment requirements;
(3) special police operations, training, and equipment;
(4) the jurisdiction of special police officers; and
(5) regulatory oversight to suspend or revoke the commission of special
police officers.
(c) In conducting the study required under subsection (b) of this section, the
Department shall:
(1) survey and document the licensing of and regulatory requirements for
special police officers and the equivalent in surrounding states; and
(2) analyze best practices for the use of special police officers by public and
private employers in the State and surrounding states by considering:
(i) the number of special police officers in the State and surrounding
states;
– 1 –

Ch. 531 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(ii) mandated training for special police officers, including firearms
training;
(iii) the impact of the use of special police officers on public safety;
and
(iv) recorded complaints.
(d) In carrying out the study, the Department shall consult with:
(1) special police officers;
(2) employers of special police officers, including local or county
governments that employ special police officers;
(3) a representative of the Maryland Chiefs of Police Association;
(4) a representative of the Maryland Sheriffs’ Association;
(5) a representative of the Maryland State Police Licensing Division;
(6) a representative of the Maryland State’s Attorneys’ Association;
(7) a representative of the Office of the Secretary of State; and
(8) a representative of a security training academy that provides training
for special police officers.
(e) On or before December 1, 2026, the Department shall submit a report of its
findings and recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the
State Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 2 –